Utah statutes.
63G-6a-702.   Contracts awarded by request for proposals.

(1)  A request for proposals standard procurement process may be used instead of bidding if the procurement officer determines, in writing, that the request for proposals standard procurement process will provide the best value to the procurement unit.

(2)  The request for proposals standard procurement process is appropriate to use for:

(a)  the procurement of professional services;

(b)  a design-build procurement;

(c)  when cost is not the most important factor to be considered in making the selection that is most advantageous to the procurement unit; or

(d)  when factors, in addition to cost, are highly significant in making the selection that is most advantageous to the procurement unit.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

